Wisconsin, session 2025, AB657.
do enact as follows:AB657,13Section 1. 77.54 (76) of the statutes is created to read:AB657,2,3477.54 (76) (a) The sales price from the sale of and the storage, use, or other 1consumption of any of the following used exclusively for a qualified nuclear fusion 2technology project, as defined in s. 238.42 (1), and used solely at the qualified 3nuclear fusion technology project’s location:AB657,2,541. Data acquisition, procession, storage, and visualization software and 5hardware.AB657,2,762. Ion cyclotron resonance heating systems, radio frequency signal generators, 7tetrodes, coaxial transmission lines, and radio frequency antennae.AB657,2,983. Pre-ionization systems, helicon plasma guns and injectors, and electron 9guns.AB657,2,10104. Ceiling-mounted cranes or lifts.AB657,2,11115. Rail systems for vessel movement and alignment.AB657,2,12126. Cooling tower infrastructure.AB657,2,13137. High-voltage power supplies with an output of 1,000 volts or more.AB657,2,14148. Electromagnets having a magnetic flux density of 0.1 tesla or more.AB657,2,16159. High-temperature superconductors having a critical temperature of 77 16kelvins or above.AB657,2,171710. Superconductors.AB657,2,181811. Steady-state lasers having an output of 10 kilowatts or more.AB657,2,191912. Gyrotrons.AB657,2,202013. Neutral beam injection systems and subsystems.AB657,2,212114. Radio frequency transmitters.AB657,2,222215. Radio frequency transmission lines and antennae.AB657,2,232316. Waveguides for frequencies exceeding one gigahertz.AB657,2,242417. Vacuum pumps.AB657,3,1118. Cryopumps capable of providing ultimate pressures of 0.001 torr or less.AB657,3,3219. Vacuum vessels manufactured of stainless steel or a reduced activation 3ferritic-martensitic steel.AB657,3,4420. Vacuum valves capable of maintaining pressures of 0.000001 torr or less.AB657,3,5521. Hydrogen isotopic separation systems.AB657,3,6622. Direct internal recycling systems of the nuclear fusion fuel cycle.AB657,3,7723. Tritium extraction systems for fusion blankets.AB657,3,8824. Air detritiation systems.AB657,3,9925. Water detritiation systems.AB657,3,101026. Gas recovery systems for sulfur hexafluoride.AB657,3,111127. Electromagnetic pumps for pumping liquid metals.AB657,3,121228. Gettering systems.AB657,3,131329. Motor generators.AB657,3,141430. Liquid metal flow circuits.AB657,3,151531. Bubble detectors.AB657,3,161632. Scintillators.AB657,3,181733. Personnel dosimeters and other personal protective equipment, including 18high-voltage, laser, and construction personal protective equipment.AB657,3,191934. Klaxons and alerting systems, including interlock systems.AB657,3,202035. High-voltage pulsed power supplies.AB657,3,222136. High-power energy storage of greater than one megawatt, including 22battery, flywheel, and capacitor systems.AB657,3,232337. Battery storage systems.AB657,3,242438. Capacitors and supercapacitors.AB657,4,1139. Switching technologies.AB657,4,2240. Transformers.AB657,4,3341. Thermal storage systems.AB657,4,4442. Materials used to create nuclear energy bioshields and bunkers. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab657 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab657 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB657 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB657 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB657: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting